Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201817-402
Consolidation; procedure.

When any city or village shall desire to be annexed to another contiguous city or village, the city council or village board of trustees of each city or village shall appoint three commissioners to arrange and report to such city council or village board of trustees respectively the terms and conditions on which the proposed annexation can be made. If the city council or village board of trustees of each such city or village approves of the terms and conditions of such proposed annexation by ordinance, the city council or village board of trustees of each of such cities or villages shall submit the question of such annexation, upon the terms and conditions so proposed, to the electors of the respective cities or villages. If a majority of the electors of each such city or village vote in favor of such annexation, the city council or village board of trustees of each shall, by ordinance, declare such annexation. A certified copy of the whole proceedings of the city or village shall be filed with the city clerk or village clerk to which the annexation is made.

Laws 1879, § 92, p. 228;

R.S.1913, § 5083;

C.S.1922, § 4255;

C.S.1929, § 17-404;

R.S.1943, § 17-402;

Laws 2017, LB133, § 107.